Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 91, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 90, O.S.L. 2023 (63 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 91), is amended to read as follows:


Section 91. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until


July 1, 2025 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma


Sunset Law, an oversight Board to be known as the State Anatomical


Board, to be composed of the following members:


1. The Deans or their designee of each accredited medical


school and osteopathic medical school within the State of Oklahoma;


2. The persons heading the Department of Anatomy, or comparable


department, in the medical and osteopathic medical schools or their


designee;

Req. No. 10607 Page 1


3. Two persons appointed jointly by the presidents of


institutions of higher education within the state which have


educational programs other than medical which require on a regular


basis human anatomical materials, provided that these programs have


been approved by the State Regents for Higher Education; and


4. One at-large member appointed by the Governor to represent


the interests of the citizens of this state.


B. It shall be the duty of the State Anatomical Board to


register all anatomical donor programs and non-transplant tissue


banks and to designate agents to provide for the collection,


preservation, storage, distribution, delivery, recovery from users,


cremation and final disposition of all dead human bodies used for


health science education and research in the State of Oklahoma.


C. The Board shall elect from its membership a chairperson who


shall perform such other duties as the Board may prescribe by rule.


The Board shall have full power to establish rules for its


government, to appoint and remove officers, and to appoint an


executive director who shall keep full and complete minutes of its


transactions and manage the affairs of the Board. The expenditures


authorized in this section shall not be a charge against the state,


but shall be paid by the agent designated by the Board to receive,


store, issue, and cremate human anatomical materials. Records shall


also be kept by the agent of all bodies received and distributed for


the period of time authorized by the Records Disposition Schedule.

Req. No. 10607 Page 2


The name of the oversight Board shall be the State Anatomical Board,


hereinafter called the Anatomical Board. The Anatomical Board may,


in its discretion, exempt any county, district, or institution from


the provisions of this act in any calendar year for any length of


time.




60-1-10607 SW 12/04/24



































Req. No. 10607 Page 3